Tennessee, session 114, SB0927.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-3-1102, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(e) In furtherance of the board's duties under subdivision (a)(3), the board shall
coordinate with wineries across this state in an effort to create a statewide wine trail.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0927
002792
- 1 -